Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.820

Qualified requirement for health carrier in insurance holding company to offer silver and gold health plans.

(1) For plan years beginning January 1, 2020, at least one health carrier in an insurance holding company system must offer in the exchange at least one silver and one gold qualified health plan in any county in which any health carrier in that insurance holding company system offers a fully insured health plan that was approved, on or after June 7, 2018, by the school employees' benefits board or the public employees' benefits board to be offered to employees and their covered dependents under this chapter.

(2) The rates for a health plan approved by the school employees' benefits board or the public employees' benefits board may not include the administrative costs or actuarial risks associated with a qualified health plan offered under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The authority shall perform an actuarial review during the annual rate setting process for plans approved by the school employees' benefits board or the public employees' benefits board to ensure compliance with subsection (2) of this section.

(4) For purposes of this section, "exchange" and "health carrier" have the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

(5) For purposes of this section, "insurance holding company system" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.31B.005.

[ 2018 c 219 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 219: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Access to health care is fundamental to the health and safety of the citizens of Washington state;

(b) Health insurance coverage is necessary for most people to access health care;

(c) Due to uncertainty in the health insurance marketplace, volatility in the current federal regulatory environment, and rising health care costs, ensuring access to the private health insurance market in every county in Washington state is becoming more difficult;

(d) The consequences of losing private health insurance coverage in a county would be catastrophic, leading to deteriorating health outcomes, lost productivity, and lower quality of life; and

(e) If the private market fails to provide coverage in a county, the state must intervene.

(2) The legislature therefore intends to:

(a) Leverage the provider networks used by private insurers offering coverage to state and school employees to ensure private insurance coverage is available in all counties where those insurers offer coverage to state and school employees; and

(b) Until such coverage is available, make coverage in the Washington state health insurance pool more affordable to persons residing in counties where no private insurance is available." [ 2018 c 219 s 1.]